Maryland, session 2025, HB0201.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
9–305.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0201*

HOUSE BILL 201
(E) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
AT LEAST 60 DAYS BEFORE EACH STATEWIDE PRIMARY ELECTION, EACH LOCAL
EACH LOCAL BOARD SHALL SEND THE INCLUDE A WRITTEN NOTICE REGARDING
HOW TO REQUEST A STATE–APPROVED ABSENTEE BALLOT APPLICATION WITH A
SPECIMEN BALLOT MAILED UNDER § 8–102 OF THIS ARTICLE AND ANY OTHER
MAILING TO EACH ELIGIBLE VOTER VOTERS OR ELIGIBLE VOTERS TO FURTHER
AWARENESS OF THE OPTION OF ABSENTEE VOTING.
(2) A LOCAL BOARD IS NOT REQUIRED TO SEND THE
STATE–APPROVED ABSENTEE BALLOT APPLICATION TO INCLUDE THE NOTICE
REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IN A SPECIMEN BALLOT OR
OTHER MAILING:
(I) THAT IS SENT TO A VOTER WHO HAS PERMANENT ABSENTEE
BALLOT STATUS UNDER § 9–311.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) MORE THAN ONCE PER ELECTION; OR
(III) FOR A VOTE–BY–MAIL ELECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.